Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.900

Fruits and vegetables in storage prior to enactment of chapter.

Any fruits or vegetables now in controlled atmosphere storage and removed after February 21, 1961 may be marked, shipped, represented and sold as having been exposed to controlled atmosphere storage if such fruits and vegetables meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

[ 1961 c 29 s 28.]